Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-727.03
District; statements; filed; contents; late filing; fee; duties of real estate broker, salesperson, or owner; acknowledgment from purchaser; remedy.

(1) On or before December 31 of each year, the clerk of each sanitary and improvement district shall file with the register of deeds or, if none, the county clerk of the county or counties in which the sanitary and improvement district is located a statement updated each December 31 containing the following information:

(a) The names of the members of the current board of trustees of the district;

(b) The names of the current attorney, accountant, and fiscal agent of the district;

(c) The warrant and the bond principal indebtedness of the district as of the preceding June 30. Such statement shall contain an acknowledgment that the warrant and indebtedness are reflective of such date; and

(d) The current bond tax levy and the current operating levy of the district, as described in section 31-739, as of December 31.

For any late filing of the statement, the sanitary and improvement district shall be assessed a late fee of ten dollars per day, not to exceed a total of three hundred dollars for each late filing.

(2) The real estate broker or salesperson or, if none, the owner shall distribute the most recent statement filed in accordance with this section to any prospective purchaser of any real estate located within a sanitary and improvement district.

(3) The real estate broker or salesperson or, if none, the owner shall obtain an acknowledgment from any purchaser of any real estate located within a sanitary and improvement district that the purchaser understands: (a) The property is located within a sanitary and improvement district; (b) sanitary and improvement districts are located outside the corporate limits of any municipality; (c) residents of sanitary and improvement districts are not eligible to vote in municipal elections; and (d) owners of property located within sanitary and improvement districts have limited access to services provided by nearby municipalities until and unless the property is annexed by the municipality. Such acknowledgment may be obtained separately from the disclosure required under section 76-2,120.

(4) The statement shall be distributed and the acknowledgment obtained on or before the date on which the purchaser becomes obligated to purchase such real estate. The exclusive remedy for failure to provide such statements and obtain such acknowledgments shall be an action for damages, and any such failure shall not affect title to the real estate or the validity of the conveyance.

Laws 1976, LB 313, § 12;

Laws 1977, LB 267, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 252, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 142;

Laws 1980, LB 599, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 128, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 764, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1362, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB324, § 2.